Georgia, session 2025_26, SB298.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 5-6-34 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to judgments and
rulings deemed directly appealable, procedure for review of judgments, orders, or decisions
not subject to direct appeal, scope of review, hearings in criminal cases involving a capital
offense for which death penalty is sought, and appeals involving nonmonetary judgments in
S. B. 298
- 1 -

LC 49 2325S (SCS)
child custody cases, is amended in subsection (a) by revising paragraphs (12) and (13) and
by adding a new paragraph to read as follows:
"(12) All judgments or orders entered pursuant to Code Section 35-3-37; and
(13) All judgments or orders entered pursuant to Code Section 9-11-11.1; and
(14) All judgments, orders, or rulings denying or refusing to grant immunity to one or
more parties based upon sovereign, municipal, official, qualified, or any other immunity
established by the United States Constitution or the Constitution, laws, or common law
of this state shall have the right of direct appeal under this paragraph, and such right shall
be exercised within thirty days of any judgment, order, or ruling. The right of direct
appeal under this paragraph shall not be exercised by any one party more than once in any
civil action. This paragraph shall not preclude taking an appeal pursuant to any other
paragraph in this subsection."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 298
- 2 -